Utah statutes.
55-12-104.   Article 4 -- Powers and duties of the Interstate Commission.
The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1)  provide for dispute resolution among compacting states;
(2)  promulgate rules to effect the purposes and obligations as enumerated in
this compact, which shall have the force and effect of statutory law and shall
be binding in the compacting states to the extent and in the manner provided
in this compact;
(3)  oversee, supervise, and coordinate the interstate movement of juveniles
subject to the terms of this compact and any by-laws adopted and rules
promulgated by the commission;
(4)  enforce compliance with the compact provisions, the rules promulgated by
the commission, and the by-laws, using all necessary and proper means,
including, but not limited to, the use of judicial process;
(5)  establish and maintain offices which shall be located within one or more
of the compacting states;
(6)  purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(7)  borrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of personnel;
(8)  establish and appoint committees and hire staff which it considers
necessary for the carrying out of its functions including, but not limited to,
an executive committee as required by Section 55-12-103, which shall have the
power to act on behalf of the commission in carrying out its powers and duties
hereunder;
(9)  elect or appoint any officers, attorneys, employees, agents, or
consultants, fix their compensation, define their duties, and determine their
qualifications;
(10)  establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to,
inter alia, conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications
of personnel;
(11)  accept any and all donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies,
materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of them;
(12)  lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to
own, hold, improve or use any property, real, personal, or mixed;
(13)  sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;
(14)  establish a budget and make expenditures and levy dues as provided in
Section 55-12-108;
(15)  sue and be sued;
(16)  adopt a seal and by-laws governing the management and operation of the
commission;
(17)  perform any functions necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes
of this compact;
(18)  report annually to the legislatures, governors, judiciary, and state
councils of the compacting states concerning the activities of the commission
during the preceding year, including any recommendations that may have been
adopted by the commission;
(19)  coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding the
interstate movement of juveniles for officials involved in the activity;
(20)  establish uniform standards for the reporting, collecting, and
exchanging of data; and
(21)  maintain its corporate books and records in accordance with the by-laws.
